Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB318.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402(a) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended to read:Section 402. Ineligibility for Compensation.--An employe shall be ineligible for compensation for any week--(a) In which his unemployment is due to failure, without good cause, either to apply for suitable work at such time and 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 in such manner as the department may prescribe, or to accept suitable work when offered to him by the employment office or by any employer, irrespective of whether or not such work is in "employment" as defined in this act: Provided, That such employer notifies the employment office of such offer within seven (7) days after the making thereof; however this subsection shall not cause a disqualification of a waiting week or benefits under the following circumstances: when work is offered by his employer and he is not required to accept the offer pursuant to the terms of the labor-management contract or agreement, or pursuant to an established employer plan, program or policy: Provided further, That a claimant shall not be disqualified for refusing suitable work when he is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974[.]: Provided further, That the following apply:(1) A claimant shall make a good faith effort to obtain employment in suitable work. A claimant who has applied for a position may not take any action to unreasonably discourage the claimant's own hire in suitable work , including any of the following:(i) Refusing to attend or failing to participate , without good cause, in a job interview or other applicant selection activity offered by the employer.(ii) Refusing employment or a referral for employment, without good cause, prior to an interview or a discussion of the details of a job with the employer.(2) Within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall create forms or update existing forms to enable employers to report claimants who discourage their own hire, as provided in this subsection. The forms shall 20250HB0318PN0275 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include notice of the provisions of section 802.(3) A claimant who unreasonably discourages the claimant's own hire in suitable work shall be considered to have refused an offer of work for purposes of this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0318PN0275 - 3 - 123456